Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 17 Warehouse Receipts

Cross references. —

As to bills of lading, see also chapter 16 of this title.

As to unlawful conversion by bailee, see §

6-3-402

.

As to warehouse receipts under the Uniform Commercial Code, see chapter 7 of title 34.1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d Warehouses § 101.

Liability of warehouseman or other bailee for loss of goods stored at other than agreed-upon place, 76 ALR4th 883.

93 C.J.S. Warehousemen and Safe Depositaries §§ 135, 136.

§ 34-17-101.
Issue of receipt for goods not received.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouseman, who issues or aids in issuing a receipt knowing that the goods for which such receipt is issued have not been actually received by such warehouseman, or are not under his actual control at the time of issuing such receipt, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or by both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 96, § 50; C.S. 1920, § 4288; R.S. 1931, § 121-401; C.S. 1945, § 42-401; W.S. 1957, § 34-368.

§ 34-17-102.
Issue of receipt containing false statement.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent or servant of a warehouseman, who fraudulently issues or aids in fraudulently issuing a receipt for goods knowing that it contains any false statement, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 96, § 51; C.S. 1920, § 4289; R.S. 1931, § 121-402; C.S. 1945, § 42-402; W.S. 1957, § 34-369.

§ 34-17-103.
Issue of unmarked duplicates; exception.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouseman, who issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable receipt for goods knowing that a former negotiable receipt for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncancelled, without plainly placing upon the face thereof the word “duplicate” except in the case of a lost or destroyed receipt after proceedings as provided for in section 14 [repealed], shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or by both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 96, § 52; C.S. 1920, § 4290; R.S. 1931, § 121-403; C.S. 1945, § 42-403; W.S. 1957, § 34-370.

Editor's notes. —

Section 14, ch. 96, Laws 1917, referred to in this section, has been repealed. For present similar provisions, see § 34.1-7-403.

§ 34-17-104.
Issue of receipts fraudulently stating ownership.

Where there are deposited with or held by a warehouseman goods of which he is owner, either solely or jointly or in common with others, such warehouseman, or any of his officers, agents, or servants who, knowing this ownership, issues or aids in issuing a negotiable receipt for such goods which does not state such ownership, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 96, § 53; C.S. 1920, § 4291; R.S. 1931, § 121-404; C.S. 1945, § 42-404; W.S. 1957, § 34-371.

§ 34-17-105.
Delivery of goods without obtaining negotiable receipt.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouseman who delivers goods out of the possession of such warehouseman, knowing that a negotiable receipt the negotiation of which would transfer the right to the possession of such goods, is outstanding and uncancelled, without obtaining the possession of such receipt at or before the time of such delivery, shall, except in the cases provided for in sections 14 and 36 [repealed], be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 96, § 54; C.S. 1920, § 4292; R.S. 1931, § 121-405; C.S. 1945, § 42-405; W.S. 1957, § 34-372.

Editor's notes. —

Sections 14 and 36, ch. 96, Laws 1917, referred to in this section, have been repealed. For present similar provisions, see §§ 34.1-7-601 and 34.1-7-403(a)(iii).

§ 34-17-106.
Fraudulent negotiation of receipt for mortgaged goods.

Any person who deposits goods to which he has no title, or upon which there is a lien or mortgage, and who takes for such goods a negotiable receipt which he afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive and without disclosing his want of title or the existence of the lien or mortgage shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 96, § 55; C.S. 1920, § 4293; R.S. 1931, § 121-406; C.S. 1945, § 42-406; W.S. 1957, § 34-373.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 60, ch. 96, Laws 1917, repealed §§ 6014 to 6018, C.S. 1910, and all acts or parts of acts inconsistent therewith.